Utah statutes.
76-10-704.   Misrepresenting person as officer, agent, member or promoter.

Every person who, without being authorized so to do, subscribes the name of another to, or inserts the name of another in, any prospectus, circular, or other advertisement or announcement of any corporation or joint stock association, existing or intended to be formed, with intent to permit it to be published, and thereby to lead persons to believe that the person whose name is so subscribed is an officer, agent, member, or promoter of such corporation or association, is guilty of a class B misdemeanor.

